Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.11 Family Caregivers Support Act of 2013

40-8.11-1.
Findings.

Family members, partners, and close friends provide the vast majority of long-term services and supports.

An estimated one hundred and forty-eight thousand (148,000) persons in Rhode Island are providing care at any one time to persons living in the community. The estimated value of their unpaid contributions in 2009 was one billion eight hundred eighty million dollars ($1,880,000,000).

Family or other caregivers who provide the majority of care in the home are frequently under substantial physical, psychological, and financial stress. The stress, if unrelieved by support for the caregiver, may lead to premature or unnecessary nursing home and institutional placement and health and financial burdens for the caregiver.

Respite care and other community-based supportive services for the family caregiver can relieve some of the stresses faced by caregivers; maintain and strengthen the family structure; postpone or prevent institutionalization; and lead to better outcomes for both the caregiver and care recipient.

The percent of Rhode Islanders age sixty-five (65) years of age and older is projected to grow from fourteen percent (14%) of the state population in 2010 to twenty-one percent (21%) by 2030. As persons age, they have greater dependency needs and an increased need for long-term-care services and support. Younger people with disabilities also require continued supportive long-term-care services as they age.

As informal caregivers and families are a vital part of the long-term-care services and support system, it is an important public purpose to recognize and respect their contributions; to assess their needs; and to provide them with counseling, education, and support services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 457, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 469, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 130, § 1.

40-8.11-2.
Definitions.

“Caregiver assessment” is defined and refers to a systematic process of gathering information about a caregiving situation to identify the specific problems, needs, strengths, and resources of the family caregiver, as well as the caregiver’s ability to contribute to the needs of the care recipient.

The term “family caregiver” is defined and refers to any relative, partner, friend, or neighbor who has a significant relationship with, and who provides a broad range of assistance for, an older adult or an adult or child with chronic or disabling conditions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 457, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 469, § 2.

40-8.11-3.
Caregiver assessment requirement.

The comprehensive assessment required in §

40-8.10-4(b)

as part of Medicaid long-term service reform shall also include a caregiver assessment whenever the plan of care depends on a family caregiver for providing assistance with activities of daily-living or instrumental activities of daily-living needs. The assessment shall be used to develop a plan of care that recognizes both needs of the care recipient and the caregiver. The assessment shall also serve as the basis for development and provision of an appropriate plan for caregiver information, education and training, referral, and support services. Information about available respite programs, caregiver training, and education programs, support groups, and community support services shall be included as part of the caregiver support plan. To implement the caregiver assessment, the executive office of health and human services shall adopt evidenced-based caregiver assessments and referral tools appropriate to the departments within the office that provide long-term-care services and support.

The executive office of health and human services shall develop annual reports to track data on the number of caregiver assessments conducted; the identified needs of caregivers to include both met and unmet needs; and referrals made for education, respite, and other support services. The reports shall be provided to the chairs of the house and senate finance committees as part of annual budget hearings and the chair of the long-term care coordinating council and posted on the executive office of health and human services website.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 457, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 469, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 130, § 1.